Illinois, session 104th, HB440.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Educational Opportunity for Military 5Children Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 70/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Educational Opportunity for Military Children Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-953, eff. 6-28-10.)